District of Columbia statutes.
7-1908

Qualified immunity for person reporting alleged abuse.

Any person who reports an alleged case of abuse, neglect, self-neglect, or exploitation pursuant to § 7-1903 shall be immune from civil or criminal liability for so reporting if he, she, or it has acted in good faith.

Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-156, § 9, 32 DCR 13
Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-67, § 2(h), 53 DCR 40

History

1981 Ed., § 6-2508.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 16-67 substituted “neglect, self-neglect,” for “neglect,”.

Effect of Amendments

Delayed application of Law 5-156: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-1901.

Editor's Notes